apertium-swa.swa.lexc
LEXICON V-Stems
kusoma:som V-Suffix ; ! "to study"
kucheza:chez V-Suffix ; ! "to play"
kufunga:fung V-Suffix ; ! "to close"
kufungua:fungu V-Suffix ; ! "to open"
kuona:on V-Suffix ; ! "to see"
kusema:sem V-Suffix ; ! "to say, tell"





! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
